New Jersey, session 221, A5931.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a board of education may, subject to the approval of the executive county superintendent of schools, hire a retired teacher who is a former member of the Teachers Pension and Annuity Fund on a contractual basis for a term of not more than two full school years provided that the salary paid to the retired teacher meets the criteria enumerated in subsection d. of this section. The retired teacher shall not be subject to the cancellation, reenrollment, and additional retirement allowance provisions of N.J.S.18A:66-53.2, except that the cancellation, reenrollment, and additional retirement allowance provisions shall apply if the former member becomes employed within 180 days with the employer from which the member retired. Employment or reemployment exceeding two full school years shall be subject to the provisions of N.J.S.18A:66-53.2. The former members retirement shall have been a bona fide retirement and any employment or reemployment under this section shall not be prearranged before retirement. b.  A retired teacher employed or reemployed pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall not obtain tenure in the position and any tenure or seniority rights previously obtained by the teacher shall not apply to the period of employment or reemployment. c.  The approval of the executive county superintendent of schools pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be granted only upon demonstration by the board of education that the board conducted a thorough search for candidates and that the retired teacher is the only qualified and available person for the position. d. A retired teacher employed or reemployed pursuant to subsection a. of this section may be hired on a contractual basis at a salary not less than 40 percent and not to exceed 70 percent of the median salary of a teacher employed by the board of education. 2.  a.  A taxpayer who is a retired teacher, and who has been hired on a contractual basis pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be allowed to deduct from the taxpayer's gross income an amount equal to 50 percent of the salary or other remuneration paid to the taxpayer during the taxable year for services rendered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.  For a taxpayer who claims a deduction pursuant to subsection a. of this section, and who also receives income from other sources, the taxpayer shall first claim any other exemption or deduction allowed in the taxable year against the gross income attributable to the taxpayers other sources of income before claiming any remaining allowable exemption or deduction against the portion of gross income received as salary and other remuneration for services rendered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.  Notwithstanding the rates of tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:2-1, the rate of tax imposed on the portion of gross income received as salary or other remuneration for services rendered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and which is not deducted pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be the rate of 1.4 percent regardless of the taxpayers filing status, provided that such amount of gross income exceeds the minimum taxable income for the taxpayer established in N.J.S.54A:2-4. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.